Virginia statutes. Title 25.1. Eminent Domain.
Article 2. Relocation Assistance.

§ 25.1-406.
Moving and related expenses.

Whenever the acquisition of real property for a program or project undertaken by a state agency will result in the displacement of any person, the state agency shall make fair and reasonable relocation payments to the displaced person for:

Actual reasonable expenses in moving himself, his family, business, farm operation, or other personal property;

Actual direct losses of tangible personal property as a result of moving or discontinuing a business or farm operation, which payments shall not exceed an amount equal to the reasonable expenses that would have been required to relocate such property, as determined by the state agency;

Actual reasonable expenses in searching for a replacement business or farm; and

Actual reasonable expenses necessarily incurred in reestablishing a displaced farm, nonprofit organization or small business at its new site, in accordance with criteria established by the state agency but not to exceed $25,000.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 33-75.04, 33.1-132.4; 1970, c. 40, § 25-239; 1972, c. 738; 1989, c. 714; 2000, c. 851; 2003, c. 940.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

7A M.J. Eminent Domain, §§ 35, 36; 17 M.J. Streets and Highways, § 19.

§ 25.1-407.
Optional moving expense allowance for persons displaced from dwelling.

Any displaced person eligible for payments under §

25.1-406

who is displaced from a dwelling may elect to accept the payments authorized by this section in lieu of the payments authorized by §

25.1-406

, which displaced person so electing shall receive a moving expense allowance of an amount determined according to a schedule established by the state agency. The acceptance of the payment authorized by this section shall be in lieu of any payment under § 25.1-406.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 33-75.04, 33.1-132.4; 1970, c. 40, § 25-239; 1972, c. 738; 1989, c. 714; 2000, c. 851; 2003, c. 940.

Cross references.

As to tenant relocation payments in building rehabilitation cases, see §

15.2-737

.

As to payment for conversion condominiums, see §

55.1-1982

.

As to cooperative containing conversion buildings, see §

55.1-2164

.

§ 25.1-408.
Optional payment for persons displaced from a place of business or farm operation.

Any displaced person eligible for payments under §

25.1-406

who is displaced from his place of business or farm operation and who is eligible under criteria established by the state agency may elect to accept the payment authorized by this section in lieu of the payment authorized by §

25.1-406

. Such payment shall consist of a fixed payment in an amount to be determined according to criteria established by the state agency, except that such payment shall not be less than $1,000 nor more than $75,000. A person whose sole business at the displacement site is the rental of such property to others shall not qualify for a payment under this section. The acceptance of the payment authorized by this section shall be in lieu of any payment under § 25.1-406.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 33-75.04, 33.1-132.4; 1970, c. 40, § 25-239; 1972, c. 738; 1989, c. 714; 2000, c. 851; 2003, c. 940; 2006, c. 452.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 452 substituted “$75,000” for “$50,000” in the second sentence.

§ 25.1-409.
Replacement housing for homeowners.

In addition to payments otherwise authorized by this chapter, the state agency shall make an additional payment not to exceed $31,000 to any displaced person who is displaced from a dwelling actually owned and occupied by such displaced person for not less than 90 days before the initiation of negotiations for the acquisition of the property. Such additional payment shall include the following elements:

The amount, if any, that when added to the acquisition cost of the dwelling acquired by the state agency, equals the reasonable cost of a comparable replacement dwelling;

The amount, if any, that will compensate the displaced person for any increased interest costs and other debt service costs that such person is required to pay for financing the acquisition of any comparable replacement dwelling. The amount for any increased interest or debt service costs shall be (i) determined in accordance with the criteria established by the state agency and (ii) paid only if the dwelling acquired by the state agency was encumbered by a bona fide mortgage that was a valid lien on such dwelling for not less than 180 days immediately prior to the initiation of negotiations for the acquisition of such dwelling; and

Reasonable expenses incurred by such displaced person for evidence of title, recording fees, and other closing costs incident to the purchase of the comparable replacement dwelling, but not including prepaid expenses.

The additional payment authorized by this section shall be made only to such a displaced person who purchases and occupies a decent, safe, and sanitary replacement dwelling not later than the end of the one-year period beginning on the later of (i) the date on which he receives final payment of all costs for the acquired dwelling or (ii) the date on which the state agency obligation under §

25.1-414

is met. However, the state agency may extend such period for good cause. If such period is extended, the payment under this section shall be based on the cost of relocating the person to a comparable replacement dwelling within one year of such date.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 33-75.05, 33-75.06, 33.1-132.5, 33.1-132.6; 1970, c. 40, § 25-240; 1972, c. 738; 1989, c. 714; 2003, c. 940; 2014, c. 218.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 218, effective October 1, 2014, substituted “$31,000” for “$22,500”, “90” for “180” and “before” for “prior to” in the first sentence of subsection A.

§ 25.1-410.
Replacement housing for tenants and certain homeowners.

In addition to amounts otherwise authorized by this article, a state agency shall make a payment to or for any displaced person displaced from any dwelling not eligible to receive a payment under §

25.1-409

which dwelling was actually and lawfully occupied by such displaced person for not less than 90 days immediately prior to (i) the initiation of negotiations for acquisition of the dwelling or (ii) if the displacement is not a direct result of acquisition, such other event as the state agency shall prescribe. Such payment shall consist of the amount necessary to enable such displaced person to lease or rent, for a period not to exceed 42 months, a comparable replacement dwelling, but not to exceed $7,200. At the discretion of the state agency, a payment under this subsection may be made in periodic installments. Computation of a payment under this subsection to a low-income displaced person for a comparable replacement dwelling shall take into account such person’s income.

Any person eligible for a payment under subsection A may elect to apply such payment to a down payment on, and other incidental expenses pursuant to, the purchase of a decent, safe, and sanitary replacement dwelling. Any such person may, at the discretion of the state agency, be eligible under this subsection for the maximum payment allowed under subsection A.

History.

1972, c. 738, § 25-241; 1989, c. 714; 2003, c. 940; 2011, cc. 117, 190; 2014, c. 218.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2011, cc. 117 and 190, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not apply to the acquisition of real property by a railroad, public service corporation, municipal corporation, local governmental unit, or political subdivision of the Commonwealth or any department, agency, or instrumentality thereof, or two or more of the aforementioned, that is (i) the subject of a certificate recorded prior to July 1, 2011, in the clerk’s office where deeds are recorded; (ii) the subject of a petition for condemnation filed prior to July 1, 2011; or (iii) required to construct a project funded by bonds approved for issuance by a locality prior to July 1, 2011.”

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 117 and 190 are identical, and in subsection A, inserted “state” in clause (ii) of the first sentence and in the next-to-last sentence.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 218, effective October 1, 2014, substituted “$7,200” for “$5,250” in subsection A and deleted “except that if the displaced homeowner has owned and occupied the dwelling from which he is displaced for at least 90 days but not more than 180 days immediately prior to the initiation of negotiations for the acquisition of such dwelling, such payment shall not exceed the payment such person would otherwise have received under subsection A of §

25.1-409

had the person owned and occupied the displacement dwelling 180 days immediately prior to the initiation of such negotiations” from the end of subsection B.

§ 25.1-411.
Relocation planning, assistance coordination, and advisory services.

Programs or projects undertaken by a state agency shall be planned in a manner that (i) recognizes, at an early stage in the planning of such programs or projects and before the commencement of any actions that will cause displacements, the problems associated with the displacement of individuals, families, businesses, and farm operations, and (ii) provides for the resolution of such problems in order to minimize adverse impacts on displaced persons and to expedite program or project advancement and completion.

The state agency shall ensure that the relocation assistance advisory services described in subsection C are made available to all persons displaced by the state agency. If the state agency determines that any person occupying property immediately adjacent to the real property acquired is caused substantial economic injury because of the acquisition, it may offer such person relocation advisory services under such program.

Each relocation assistance advisory program required by subsections A and B shall include such measures, facilities, or services as may be necessary or appropriate in order to:

Determine, and make timely recommendations on, the need and preferences, if any, of displaced persons for relocation assistance;

Provide current and continuing information on the availability, sales prices, and rental charges of comparable replacement dwellings for displaced homeowners and tenants and suitable locations for businesses and farm operations;

Assure that a person shall not be required to move from a dwelling unless the person has had a reasonable opportunity to relocate to a comparable replacement dwelling, except in the case of (i) a major disaster declared by the Governor; (ii) a national emergency declared by the President of the United States; or (iii) any other emergency that requires the person to move immediately from the dwelling because continued occupancy of such dwelling by such person constitutes a substantial danger to the health or safety of such person;

Assist a person displaced from his business or farm operation in obtaining and becoming established in a suitable replacement location;

Supply information concerning federal and state housing programs, disaster loan programs, and other federal or state programs offering assistance to displaced persons; and

Provide other advisory services to displaced persons in order to minimize hardships to such persons in adjusting to relocation.

The head of a state agency shall coordinate the relocation activities performed by the state agency with other project activities and other planned or proposed governmental actions in the community or nearby areas that may affect the efficient and effective delivery of relocation assistance and related services.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 33-75.03, 33.1-132.3; 1970, c. 40, § 25-242; 1972, c. 738; 1989, c. 714; 2003, c. 940; 2011, cc. 117, 190.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2011, cc. 117 and 190, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not apply to the acquisition of real property by a railroad, public service corporation, municipal corporation, local governmental unit, or political subdivision of the Commonwealth or any department, agency, or instrumentality thereof, or two or more of the aforementioned, that is (i) the subject of a certificate recorded prior to July 1, 2011, in the clerk’s office where deeds are recorded; (ii) the subject of a petition for condemnation filed prior to July 1, 2011; or (iii) required to construct a project funded by bonds approved for issuance by a locality prior to July 1, 2011.”

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 117 and 190 are identical, and substituted “the state agency” for “such agency” in the first sentence in subsection B and in subsection D.

§ 25.1-412.
Administration of relocation assistance programs.

In order to prevent unnecessary expense and duplication of functions, and to promote uniform and effective administration of relocation assistance programs for displaced persons, a state agency may enter into contracts with any person for services in connection with such programs, or may carry out its functions under this chapter through any federal or state agency or instrumentality having an established organization for conducting relocation assistance programs.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 33-75.03, 33.1-132.3; 1970, c. 40, § 25-243; 1972, c. 738; 2003, c. 940.

§ 25.1-413.
Payments to certain persons displaced as the result of certain code enforcement activities.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, the governing body of a locality shall be authorized to make payments to any displaced person who is displaced by nonfederally assisted housing, plumbing, building, electrical, elevator, fire, food and health and sanitation code enforcement activities, in its discretion either (i) in amounts not exceeding the amounts authorized by the provisions of this chapter or (ii) in such lesser amounts as it may determine. Localities may adopt policies and procedures for payments to be made to persons displaced by such nonfederally assisted programs.

History.

1972, c. 738, § 25-245; 1973, c. 426; 2003, c. 940.

§ 25.1-414.
Authority of state agency where replacement housing not available; requiring person to move.

If a program or project undertaken by a state agency cannot proceed to actual construction on a timely basis because comparable replacement dwellings are not available, and the state agency determines that such dwellings cannot otherwise be made available, the state agency may take such action as is necessary or appropriate to provide such dwellings by use of funds authorized for such project. The state agency may use this section to exceed the maximum amounts that may be paid under §§

25.1-409

and

25.1-410

on a case-by-case basis for good cause as determined in accordance with such regulations as the state agency shall issue.

No person shall be required to move from his dwelling on account of any project, unless the head of the state agency is satisfied that comparable replacement housing is available to such person.

History.

1972, c. 738, § 25-247; 1989, c. 714; 2003, c. 940; 2011, cc. 117, 190.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2011, cc. 117 and 190, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not apply to the acquisition of real property by a railroad, public service corporation, municipal corporation, local governmental unit, or political subdivision of the Commonwealth or any department, agency, or instrumentality thereof, or two or more of the aforementioned, that is (i) the subject of a certificate recorded prior to July 1, 2011, in the clerk’s office where deeds are recorded; (ii) the subject of a petition for condemnation filed prior to July 1, 2011; or (iii) required to construct a project funded by bonds approved for issuance by a locality prior to July 1, 2011.”

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 117 and 190 are identical, and substituted “the state agency” for “such agency” in the first sentence in subsection A.

§ 25.1-415.
Adjustments to certain benefit limits.

The monetary limits provided for in §§

25.1-406

,

25.1-408

,

25.1-409

, and

25.1-410

shall be adjusted to conform to future revisions of corresponding monetary benefits under the federal Uniform Relocation Assistance and Real Property Acquisition Policies Act of 1970 (Public Law 91-646).

History.

1981, c. 149, § 25-247.1; 2003, c. 940.

Cross references.

As to tenant relocation payments in building rehabilitation cases, see §

15.2-737

.

As to payment for conversion condominiums, see §

55.1-1982

.

As to cooperative containing conversion buildings, see §

55.1-2164

.

Editor’s note.

For the federal Uniform Relocation Assistance and Real Property Acquisition Policies Act of 1970, referred to in this section, see generally in 42 U.S.C.S. § 4601 et seq.

§ 25.1-416.
Application of article.

The provisions of this article shall apply for the benefit of (i) owners and (ii) other persons who are actually and lawfully occupying the real property to be acquired and who have been occupants thereof for at least 90 days prior to the initiation of negotiations for acquisition.

History.

1972, c. 738, § 25-236; 1979, c. 235; 2000, c. 851; 2003, c. 940.